Oklahoma, session 2026, SB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
person receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Police Pension and
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who has been retired for five
(5) years or more and who continues to receive benefits on or after
the effective date of this act shall receive a two percent (2%)
increase in benefits.
B. For any member of the System who joined prior to January 1,
1981, who shall have his or her pension increased or decreased by
one-third (1/3) of any increase or decrease to the base salary of a
Req. No. 1727 Page 1

RBS No. 1727
regu lar police officer, any increase in benefits a person is
eligible to receive after July 1, 2020, shall be offset by the
increase in benefits, if any, provided by this section.

60-1-1727 RD 2/27/2025 9:31:45 AM



















Req. No. 1727 Page 2